Utah statutes.
72-4-211.   Mike Dmitrich Highway.

(1)  There is established the Mike Dmitrich Highway composed of the existing Highway 6 from Interstate 15 to Interstate 70.

(2)  In addition to other official designations, the Department of Transportation shall designate the portions of the highway identified in Subsection (1) as the Mike Dmitrich Highway on future state highway maps.



Enacted by Chapter 375, 2009 General Session

